errortag-src/propernoun-sme-morph.txt
LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-OBL
 +Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
 +Ess:X4n K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8 Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN:X4 Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Gen:Y5 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:Y5 K ;
 +Sg+Loc:Y5s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:Y5n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Nom:Y5 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:Y6j K ;
 +Sg+Com:Y6jn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Y6jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:Y6jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Y6jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:Y6jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:Y6jgujn K ;
! :Y5 DenominalNounsV ;			!only to ani, fem, mal

!LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-DC !lifted up to -plc

LEXICON MARJA-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> MARJADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Ani+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>X6ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> MARJADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>X6ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> MARJADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>X6ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJA-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> MARJADECL ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-LOAN-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> MARJADECL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ; !


LEXICON MARJA-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> MARJADECL ;
 :%> PLACELASH ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ;

LEXICON MARJA-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> MARJADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

!LEXICON MARJA ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJADECL ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
 ACCRA-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X3 ACCRA-I ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X4 ACCRA-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X8 MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X5 ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON MARJADECL-LOAN ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
 ACCRA-DC-LOAN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@X3 ACCRA-I ; !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@X4 ACCRA-OBL ; !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@X8 MARJA-SHORTGEN ; !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@X5 ACCRA-IICASE ; !

LEXICON MARJA-SHORTGEN  ! Gásakjávrre
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: K ; ! 
 +CmpN/SgG:- Rreal ; !    for placenames
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:   Rreal ; ! for placenames
! +Sg+Acc: K ;

LEXICON SUOPMA-plc !for Sápmi, Suopma, Ruoŧŧa, no laš, no VUONAK
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> MARJADECL ;


!LEXICON SIJTE-ani
! +N+Prop+Ani:%> SIJTEDECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> SIJTEDECL ;

!LEXICON SIJTE-objplc
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> SIJTEDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Plc:%> SIJTEDECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> SIJTEDECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  SIJTEDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SIJTE-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  SIJTEDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

!LEXICON SIJTE-femsur
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  SIJTEDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sur:%>  SIJTEDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

!LEXICON SIJTE-malfem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  SIJTEDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Mal:%>  SIJTEDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SIJTE-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> SIJTEDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SIJTE-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  SIJTEDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON SIJTE-surplc ! Names that are both surnames and place names
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> SIJTEDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> SIJTEDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;



LEXICON SIJTEDECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for SIJTE, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA ! Muhto gč. dat kommentára... Imaštallan dan gal veha...
 ACCRA-DC ;                          !Nom, Ess
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@W9 ACCRA-I ; ! ! Here, we allow for Illative Sijtei
  !Dát ii oro doibmamin, go Sijtei lea dovdameahttun lookupis. W9hmm, sáhtá leat konv-feailla.
  !Does not work, W9 is commented out in twol.
  !NB! Sijtii is norm, Sijtei is SUB, the -ei-illative should just be used in cases like Marie (where it already works)
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I ;      !Here, we allow for Illative Sijtii
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE ;

!! ! \\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\
!! ! Discussing e- and o-final wds:
!! ! e (appr 2100 of these in corpus)

!! ! e-fin __with_ Grad and __with__ Ill change ++  Ánde, Ándde, Ándii           sme names
!! ! e-fin inab to Grad and __with_  Ill change *+  Lene, Lene, Lenii            sme and foreign names
!! ! e-fin without Grad and __with__ Ill change -+  Brende, Brende, Brendii      foreign names
!! !
!! ! e-fin __with_ Grad and optional Ill change +%  *
!! ! e-fin inab to Grad and optional Ill change *%  Sijte, Sijte, Sijtei/Sijtii  foreign (sma?) names
!! ! e-fin without Grad and optional Ill change -%  ?                            Perhaps other sma names
!! !
!! ! e-fin __with_ Grad but without  Ill change +-  *
!! ! e-fin inab to Grad and without  Ill change *-  *
!! ! e-fin without Grad and without  Ill change --  Valle, Valle, Vallei.        Loans
!! !
!! ! o (appr. 90 of these in corpus)
!! ! o-fin __with_ Grad and __with_  Ill change ++
!! ! o-fin inab to Grad and __with_  Ill change *+
!! ! o-fin without Grad but __with_  Ill change -+  Áilo, Áilo, Áilui ?? *

!! ! o-fin without Grad and without  Ill change *+  Teppo9j:Teppoi

!! ! Solution
!! ! Lexicon structure according to Ill. Forms inable to Grad go with Grad, as for GOAHTI
!! ! Suggestion:
!! ! ACCRA  is -CG and -Illchange Valle
!! ! MARJA  is +CG and +Illchange Ánde
!! ! BRENDE is -CG and +Illchange Brende
!! ! SIJTE  is +CG and %Illchange Sijte
!! ! ?????  is -CG and %Illchange
!! ! Lene can be MARJA or BRENDE, but according to GOAHTI practice, we assign it to MARJA

!! ! Now:
!! ! ACCRA: only   Sijtei -CG
!! ! MARJA: only   Sijtii +CG
!! ! SIJTE: Sijtii Sijtei -CG
!! !
!! ! Previous suggestion for future fix: ideal lexicon structure:
!! ! a. forms common to all of the above 3
!! ! b. cg
!! !    b.i.  alternating
!! !    b.ii. insensitive to alternation
!! ! c. ill-change
!! !    c.i change in front of i
!! !    c.ii no change in front of i
!! !
!! ! ACCRA a, bii, cii
!! ! MARJA a, bi,  ci
!! ! SIJTE a, bii, ci, cii
!! ! ????? a, bii, ci
!! ! Sijte guoská dušše namaid, maid loahpus lea -e.
!! ! joa, muhto prinsiphas livččii vejolaš čállit ođđasit dákar ábc-systema. Ok
!!
!!
!! ! //////////////////////////////////////



!LEXICON PIERA-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:%> PIERADECL ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

!LEXICON PIERA !Bisyll. a-Proper Names without Gradation ; a/i-Illative
! +N+Prop:%>PIERADECL ;
! This one has not been split yet.

!LEXICON PIERADECL
! @U.Cap.Obl@+Sg+Ill:j@U.Cap.Obl@ K ; ! <=== What is this
! ACCRA-DC ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL ;

!These ones still not in use.
!LEXICON GUOLBBA-obj
! GUOLBBADECL ;
!LEXICON GUOLBBA-org
! GUOLBBADECL ;
!LEXICON GUOLBBA-mal
! GUOLBBADECL ;
!LEXICON GUOLBBA-fem
! GUOLBBADECL ;
!LEXICON GUOLBBA-sur
! GUOLBBADECL ;
LEXICON GUOLBBA-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> GUOLBBADECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ;  !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ;



!LEXICON GUOLBBA ! Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns
! +N+Prop:%>GUOLBBADECL ;

LEXICON GUOLBBADECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ GUOLBBA-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ GUOLBBA-DC ;

LEXICON GUOLBBA-OBL
 +Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
 +Ess:X4n K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8 Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN:X4 Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Gen:X2a K ; ! MALLAS- but for Prop
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X2 K ; !
 +CmpN/SgG:X2a Rreal ; !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2 Rreal ;  !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2a- Rreal ; ! !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:X2- Rreal ;  ! !compound also for these
 +Sg+Acc:X2a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X2 K ; !
 +Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X2ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
 +CmpN/PlG:X2ijd Rreal ;
 +Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:X2ijgujn K ;

!LEXICON GUOLBBA-DC !moved up to -plc

LEXICON ACCRA-DC          ! a. Earlier solution   | b. Ideal solution
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-NE ;   ! U.Cap.Obl Accra       | Accra
! @U.Cap.Opt@ ACCRA-ADJ ; ! U.Cap.Opt [Aa]ccralaš | U.Cap.Down accralaš  !moved to -plc

 ! Now, we have b., in principle, but with different-named tags:
 ! The .Obl@ diacritic tag is not used at all.
 ! The .Opt@ diacritic is now somewhat contraintuitively used for compulsatory downcasing.
 ! Then downcase.regex takes care of downcasing, and case.regex of optional upcasing.
 ! downcase.regex: A  ->  a || .#. %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ _ ;
 ! case.regex:     A (->) a || .#. _ ;

LEXICON ACCRA-NE
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Ess:n K ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-DC-LOAN     ! a. Earlier solution   | b. Ideal solution
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-NE-LOAN ;   ! U.Cap.Obl Accra       | Accra
! @U.Cap.Opt@ ACCRA-ADJ ; !SUB ! U.Cap.Opt [Aa]ccralaš | U.Cap.Down accralaš  !moved to -plc

 ! Now, we have b., in principle, but with different-named tags:
 ! The .Obl@ diacritic tag is not used at all.
 ! The .Opt@ diacritic is now somewhat contraintuitively used for compulsatory downcasing.
 ! Then downcase.regex takes care of downcasing, and case.regex of optional upcasing.
 ! downcase.regex: A  ->  a || .#. %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ _ ;
 ! case.regex:     A (->) a || .#. _ ;

LEXICON ACCRA-NE-LOAN
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub-:- Rreal ; !
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n K ; !


!LEXICON ACCRA-ADJ
! +Der/laš:lažž DEARVVASLAS ;

LEXICON ACCRA-I
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;

LEXICON ACCRA-OBL
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub: Rreal ;   ! ! for placenames
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; ! ! for placenames
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;

LEXICON ACCRA-IICASE
 +Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

! Vowel-final names where the final vowel carries
! primary or secondary stress. Monosyllables and
! Scandinavian stressed compounds in -V belong here.

LEXICON NYSTØ-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%>  NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%>  NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%>  NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
